en: Cooked white fish without skin
fr: Poisson blanc cuit, Poisson blanc cuit sans la peau

en: Cooked marine white fish without skin
fr: Poisson blanc de mer cuit

en: White fish with Provencal sauce, White fish with Provencal-style tomato sauce
fr: Poisson blanc à la provençale, Poisson blanc à la niçoise

en: White fish with Florentine sauce, White fish with Florentine-style sauce, White fish with spinach sauce
fr: Poisson blanc à la sauce florentine, Poisson blanc à la sauce aux épinards

en: White fish with mustard sauce
fr: Poisson blanc à la sauce moutarde

en: White fish with tarragon sauce
fr: Poisson blanc à l'estragon

en: White fish with sorrel sauce
fr: Poisson blanc sauce oseille

en: Meals with cod
es: Comidas con bacalao
fr: Plats au cabillaud, plats à la morue
hr: Jela s bakalarom
it: Pasti con merluzzo
lt: Patiekalai su menke
nl: Kabeljauwgerechten

en: Meals with salmon
bg: Ястия със сьомга
de: Gerichte mit Lachs
es: Comidas con salmón, Platos con salmón
fi: lohiateriat
fr: Plats au saumon
hr: Jela s lososom
it: Pasti con salmone
lt: Patiekalai su lašiša
nl: Zalmmaaltijden

en: Stuffed salmon
fr: Saumon farci

en: Meals with tuna
bg: Ястия с риба тон
fr: Plats au thon
hr: Jela s tunom
lt: Patiekalai su tunu
nl: Tonijnmaaltijden

en: Cod brandade
de: Brandade
es: Brandade De Bacalao
fr: Brandades de morue, Brandade de morue
hr: Brandade od bakalara
nl: Kabeljauwbrandade

en: Meals with falafels
fr: Plats préparés aux falafels

en: Meals with meat
bg: Ястия с месо
ca: Aliments amb carn
de: Fleischgerichte, Mahlzeiten mit Fleisch
es: Comidas con carne
fi: Liha-ateria
fr: Plats préparés à la viande, plats à base de viande, Plats préparés à base de viande
he: מנות עם בשר
hr: Jela s mesom
hu: Ételek hússal, Húsos ételek
it: Pasti con carne
lt: Patiekalai su mėsa
nl: Vleesmaaltijden
pl: Posiłki z mięsem, Dania gotowe z mięsem
pt: Refeições com carne
ru: Блюда с мясом
sv: Rätter med kött
zh: 肉餐

en: Frozen meals with meat
fr: Plats préparés surgelés à la viande

en: Canned meals with meat
fr: Plats préparés en conserve à la viande

en: Sausages with lentils, Sausage with lentils
de: Würstchen mit Linsen
fi: linssimakkarat
fr: Saucisses aux lentilles, saucisse aux lentilles, saucisses avec lentilles, saucisse avec lentilles, saucisses lentilles, saucisse lentilles
hr: Kobasice s lećom
it: Salsicce con lenticchie
lt: Dešrelės su lęšiais
nl: Worst met linzen

en: Sausage in a brioche crust
fr: Saucissons briochés, Brioches au saucisson

en: Ghivetch
fr: Djuwetsch, Djuvec

en: Fasulye, Kuru fasulye
fr: Fasulye, kuru fasulye